Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 1. Generally

§ 18-4-101.
Public money to be paid into treasury.

All county officers receiving money for any county shall pay the same into the county treasury of the proper county.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 31, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1916; R.S. 1899, § 1232; C.S. 1910, § 1144; C.S. 1920, § 1380; R.S. 1931, § 30-123; C.S. 1945, § 28-101; W.S. 1957, § 18-230; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-4-102.
Officers to be paid in warrants; direct deposit program authorized.

All county officers are prohibited from paying themselves from money belonging to any county which may be in their possession, but shall receive pay for services rendered to a county by warrants drawn upon the county treasury by the board of county commissioners.

All salary and wage payments to persons employed by a county including county officers may be made by direct deposit if the county clerk chooses to implement a direct deposit program, unless the employee elects not to participate in the program. The county clerk shall receive an order from the board of county commissioners authorizing the release of monies prior to each county payroll distribution as provided by subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 31, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1917; R.S. 1899, § 1233; C.S. 1910, § 1145; C.S. 1920, § 1381; R.S. 1931, § 30-124; C.S. 1945, § 28-102; W.S. 1957, § 18-231; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 6, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (b), designating the existing provision as (a).

§ 18-4-103.
Office of county clerk and budget-making authority compatible.

The office of county clerk and the office of budget-making authority are declared compatible.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 162, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 28-104; W.S. 1957, § 18-232; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-4-104.
Certificates of indebtedness; purposes for which authorized; interest; precedence over other claims; order of payment; current year defined.

When there are insufficient funds in the county treasury to meet the current obligations of the county each board of county commissioners may issue certificates of indebtedness for current expenses of the county and particularly for maintaining courts, boarding prisoners, prosecution of criminals and salaries of county officers.

With the permission of the board of county commissioners, the county hospital, library, welfare or fair board may issue certificates of indebtedness in cases where there are insufficient funds in the county treasury to meet their current obligations for the necessary expenses for continuing the services and functions for which the boards are responsible and the expenses of the boards during July through November.

The certificates of indebtedness shall bear interest at not more than six percent (6%) per annum payable from the funds of the board issuing the certificate. The total amount of certificates issued by each of the boards shall not exceed the following amounts in any one (1) year:

For county hospitals, thirty percent (30%) of that portion of the budget approved by the board of county commissioners to be derived from tax levies during the current year;

For county fairs, eighty percent (80%) of the budget estimate of anticipated income for the year of issuance;

For county libraries, thirty percent (30%) of the budget estimate of anticipated income for the year of issuance;

For welfare boards, fifty percent (50%) of that portion of the budget for general welfare and health approved by the board of county commissioners to be derived from tax levies during the current year.

The provisions of this section do not give authority to any of the boards to spend in excess of their total budgeted expenditures as approved according to law.

Certificates are issuable by the board of county commissioners and by the county hospital, library, welfare or fair boards even though there may be a balance in the cash reserve fund of each of the boards.

The certificates of indebtedness shall be payable out of the taxes levied and collected for the current year for use of the boards and shall be paid out of the first tax funds available to each board. They shall state they are payable out of the revenues of the county for the year of issuance and shall be clearly distinguishable from county orders or warrants.

When county hospital, library, welfare or fair boards resolve to issue the certificates they shall forward to the county treasurer a copy of the resolution, certified by the presiding officer of the board, setting forth the number and amount of all such certificates to be issued.

The certificates of indebtedness are a first and prior charge upon the taxes collected for the year of their issuance, and shall be first paid out of funds in the county treasury derived from taxes, fines or other sources of revenue collected or paid into the county treasury during the year of issuance, excluding sums received for delinquent taxes or fines for any previous year.

The term “current year” as used in this section means the year commencing at twelve (12:00) noon on the preceding first Monday of January and ending at the same hour on the first Monday of the following January.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 106, §§ 1, 2, 4; R.S. 1899, §§ 1218, 1219, 1221; C.S. 1910, §§ 1130, 1131, 1133; Laws 1913, ch. 120, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1920, §§ 1364, 1365, 1367; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-104, 30-105, 30-107; Laws 1943, ch. 110, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 28-105 to 28-107; Laws 1953, ch. 50, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-233 to 18-235; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to endorsement on bond or evidence of debt that is issued pursuant to law and is within debt limit, see art. 16, § 8, Wyo. Const.

As to counties not being liable for claims for treatment of contagious diseases except for indigent patients, see §

35-4-102

.

As to payment of expenses caused by quarantine of area because of infectious or contagious disease, see §

35-4-103

.

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Reference. —

This section is referred to in settling property and indebtedness between a new county and the parent county. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

Refunding bonds. —

A county may issue refunding bonds to redeem outstanding bonds. Board of Comm'rs v. Rollins, 9 Wyo. 281, 62 P. 351,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1900).

Revocation. —

Where county commissioners contracted with attorneys to defend county in court actions, allowed claim for retainer and issued certificates of indebtedness, which were registered and assigned by payees for value, but later passed resolution to effect that attorneys had not rendered service, cancelled certificates and ordered treasurer not to pay them, allowance of claim and issuance of certificates did not preclude county from contesting the claim, as certificates are merely orders on the treasurer to pay when funds available, and may be revoked and payment stopped if later a defense develops which justifies recision of contract. Treasurer in a mandamus action may plead the resolution and order of commissioners as his defense. State ex rel. Robertson Inv. Co. v. Patterson, 47 Wyo. 416, 38 P.2d 617,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1934).

Cited

in

In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1898).

§ 18-4-105.
Order of paying warrants; exception as to Laramie and Albany counties.

All taxes and licenses are payable in money, and all properly attested orders and warrants are entitled to preference for payment according to date of presentation and acceptance at the treasurer’s office, the oldest date to have preference. The treasurer shall not refuse to pay any order or warrant because there are unpresented prior orders or warrants if there is sufficient money in the treasury to pay all prior orders or warrants, with interest due thereon, as well as the order then presented. When the total of payable, interest drawing unpresented orders, amounts to five hundred dollars ($500.00), the treasurer shall cause two (2) weekly notices to be inserted in the official county newspaper briefly describing them by numbers, date, amount and in whose favor drawn, notifying the holders that they will cease to draw interest ten (10) days after the second notice. This section shall not apply to Laramie and Albany counties.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 62, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 3816; R.S. 1899, § 1856; C.S. 1910, § 2390; C.S. 1920, § 2839; R.S. 1931, § 115-304; C.S. 1945, § 28-108; W.S. 1957, § 18-236; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

Kelley v. Rhoads, 7 Wyo. 237, 51 P. 593,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 2

, 39 L.R.A. 594 (1898).

§ 18-4-106.
Cancellation of warrants and certificates; generally.

The county treasurer shall on the first Monday of December in each year cancel all unpaid county warrants which have been issued for more than twelve (12) months. He shall at the same time cancel all county certificates of indebtedness issued by the board of county commissioners or by the county hospital, library, welfare or fair boards which have not been presented for payment within one (1) year after he has given legal notice that there was money in the county treasury to pay them. The county treasurer shall certify to the board of county commissioners or to the county hospital, library, welfare or fair board the number and amount of each county warrant and certificate of indebtedness cancelled. The board of county commissioners and the county hospital, library, welfare or fair boards shall enter the list upon its journal and have the list published in the minutes of the regular December meeting of the board of county commissioners or the county hospital, library, welfare or fair boards.

Any person holding a cancelled county warrant or certificate of indebtedness may present the warrant or certificate to the board of county commissioners within five (5) years after the date of cancellation, and they shall issue the holder of the warrant or certificate a new warrant in the same amount due on the original warrant or certificate at the time cancelled.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 127, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1910, §§ 1201, 1202; C.S. 1920, §§ 1447, 1448; Laws 1927, ch. 2, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-1120, 30-1121; C.S. 1945, §§ 28-109, 28-110; Laws 1953, ch. 50, § 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-237, 18-238; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to cancellation of school district warrants, see §

21-13-103

.

Apportionment of indebtedness. —

Amount of cancelled warrants and certificates should be included as part of indebtedness of original county in apportioning indebtedness between it and a new county. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 25 Wyo. 172, 166 P. 674,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1917).

§ 18-4-107.
County officer discounting warrant; penalty.

Any treasurer, clerk, sheriff, or member of the board of commissioners of a county, who shall purchase or receive any warrant or demand against such county for less than the face value of such demand, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 128; R.S. 1899, § 5094; C.S. 1910, § 5945; C.S. 1920, § 7234; R.S. 1931, § 32-625; C.S. 1945, § 9-639; W.S. 1957, § 6-177; W.S. 1977, § 6-8-507; Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 1.

§ 18-4-108.
Refusal of county treasurer to pay indebtedness or receive order in payment of taxes; penalty therefor.

Any county treasurer who, upon presentation of any auditor’s warrant, county order, or like evidence of indebtedness for payment, shall refuse payment thereof, there being then in such treasury sufficient funds appropriated by law for the payment of such warrant, order or like indebtedness, or wherefrom by law, payment thereof ought to be made, and any county treasurer or collector of taxes who, upon presentation of any auditor’s warrant, county order or other like certificate or evidence of indebtedness in payment of any taxes which may by law, be paid therein, shall refuse to receive such order, warrant or certificate in payment of such taxes, every such officer so offending shall be liable to indictment and upon conviction shall be fined in any sum not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00). This section shall extend to the deputies of every such treasurer or collector of taxes.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 145; R.S. 1899, § 5105; C.S. 1910, § 5956; C.S. 1920, § 7245; R.S. 1931, § 32-636; C.S. 1945, § 9-641; W.S. 1957, § 6-179; W.S. 1977, § 6-8-509; Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the county treasurer failing, neglecting or refusing to pay any order presented to him for payment, there being then money in the treasury appropriated for that purpose, as guilty of malfeasance, see §

18-3-813

.